District of Columbia statutes.
47-1330

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Costs” means amounts paid or payable by the purchaser to the District in connection with the sale of a real property.

(2)

“Tax” means unpaid real property tax and vault rent owing as of October 1, and unpaid business improvement district tax owing as of September 1, including penalties, interest, and costs, as calculated by the Mayor. The term “tax” includes an assessment or charge due at any time to the District and certified to the Mayor for collection under this chapter in the same manner as a real property tax, along with permitted penalties, interest, and costs, as calculated by the Mayor.

(2A)

“Tax sale date” or “date of the tax sale” means for purposes of the tax sale held under § 47-1346 the date when the tax sale during which the real property was sold concluded.

(3)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(4)

“Expenses” means amounts paid or payable by the purchaser to persons other than the District in connection with the sale of a real property.

(4A)

“Premises address” means the address, if any, for the square, suffix, and lot numbers, or parcel and lot numbers, of real property as reflected in the records in the Office of Tax and Revenue.

(5)

“Purchaser” shall include the purchaser at the tax sale, the holder of the certificate of sale, the assignee or transferee of the certificate of sale, the plaintiff, or the District, as the context requires.

(6)

“Superior Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(7)

“Surplus” means the portion of the bid at the tax sale that exceeds the taxes, penalties, interest, and costs for which the property was sold.

(8)

“Taxing agency” means an agency of the District which may levy a tax, assessment, or charge collectible under this chapter. The term “taxing agency” shall include a business improvement district.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
Dec. 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-141, § 101(c)(2), 61 DCR 7763
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7102(c)(2), 7104, 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 42-407, § 42-3131.06, § 42-3141.09, § 47-1055, § 47-1064, and § 47-1336.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-141, repealed before its effective date, would have rewritten (2); and added (2A) and (4A).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote (2); and added (2A) and (4A).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(oo) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(pp) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(pp) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(2) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-342, May 28, 2014, 61 DCR 5691).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(2) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-409, Aug. 1, 2014, 61 DCR 8281).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7112(c)(2) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(c)(2) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(c), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(c)(2) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(c), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).
D.C. Law 20-141 became effective on Dec. 4, 2014, but was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by § 7104 of emergency D.C. Act 20-566, effective January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884; and by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.